src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/verb_prefixes_new.lexc
LEXICON VERB_PREFIXES
@P.class.VAI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VII@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTA@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_PREFIXES
@P.mode.IND@	BASIC_IND_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.CON@	BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.SUB@	BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IRR@	BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IMP@	BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IND_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%< POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%< POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%< POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0 POL_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0    POL_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NULL@0	POL_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    POL_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0    POL_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES
@P.person.IMP@0    POL_PREFIXES ;


LEXICON POL_PREFIXES ! polarity prefixes (i.e., negation and similar in first slot after person)
0 TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@PS/maat+:@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@%^SPi2maat%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@PS/miin+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@miin%< PRESTEMS ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@PS/piin+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@piin%< PRESTEMS ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@PS/maataommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@%^SPi2maataommita'p%< TENSE_PREFIXES ; ! consider skipping tense
@P.neg.NEG@PS/kata'+:@P.neg.NEG@%^SPi2kata'%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@P.neg.NEG@PS/aahk+:@P.neg.NEG@%^SPaahk%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@P.neg.NEG@PS/aahksaw+:@P.neg.NEG@%^SPaahksaw%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@P.neg.NEG@PS/aahksikkam+:@P.neg.NEG@%^SPaahksikkam%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@P.neg.NEG@PS/aahksta'+:@P.neg.NEG@%^SPaahksta'%< TENSE_PREFIXES ; ! possibly only cnj
@P.neg.NEG@PS/aaksta'+:@P.neg.NEG@%^SPaaksta'%< TENSE_PREFIXES ; ! possibly only cnj



LEXICON TENSE_PREFIXES
0 PRESTEMS ;
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@PS/ayaak+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@ayaak%< PRESTEMS ; ! imm future
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@PS/yaak+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@yaak%< PRESTEMS ; ! future
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@PS/ii+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@ii%< PRESTEMS ; ! past
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@PS/na+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@na%< PRESTEMS ; ! Siksika past

LEXICON PRESTEMS
PSSET1 ;

LEXICON PSSET1
VERB_STEMS ;
NOUN_STEMS ;
PSGATE1 ;
PS/a+:a PSBOUND1 ; ! durative
PS/a'+:a' PSBOUND1 ; ! inchoative
PS/ikaa+:^SPikaa PSBOUND1 ; ! perfective, need to model initial vs non initial forms

LEXICON PSBOUND1
0:%< PSGATE1 ;
	
LEXICON PSGATE1
VERB_STEMS ;
NOUN_STEMS ;
PSSET2 ;
	
LEXICON PSSET2
PS/ohko+:ohko PSBOUND2 ; ! "contrary, undesirable"; "have the wherewithal for"
PS/omaa+:omaa PSBOUND2 ; ! "yet"; considerable allomorphy
PS/iik+:i2ik PSBOUND2 ; ! "intensifier, very"
PS/aahs+:aahs PSBOUND2 ; ! "always", could this be in an earlier slot? 
PS/aapam+:aapam	PSBOUND2 ; ! "across water"
PS/ahkiaap+:ahkiaap	PSBOUND2 ; ! "homeward"
PS/aiist+:aiist	PSBOUND2 ; ! "to location"
PS/akkaw+:akkaw	PSBOUND2 ; ! "voluminous", w ~ y variation check phonology
PS/apoyi+:apoyi	PSBOUND2 ; ! "brown or any earth tone"
PS/atso't+:atso't	PSBOUND2 ; ! "from all sides, from more than one direction"
PS/i'nak+:i2'nak	PSBOUND2 ; ! "small"; breaking, no deletion (i'nakawaatsi)
PS/i'tsin+:i'tsin	PSBOUND2 ; ! "everything"; no breaking, no deletion (i'tsinihkaa)
PS/sstsina'+:sstsina' PSBOUND2 ; ! "need to, have to VERB before doing something else"; maybe initial i2?; s-connection instead of i2?
PS/aisskahs+:aisskahs PSBOUND2 ; ! "always"
PS/noohkatt+:noohkatt PSBOUND2 ; ! "too, also";
PS/itap+:itap PSBOUND2 ; ! "toward, to"; rel root
PS/ssp+:ssp	PSBOUND2 ; ! "up, high"
PS/iksisap+:i2ksisap	PSBOUND2 ; ! "down"
PS/it+:it	PSBOUND2 ; ! "then, there"
PS/matt+:^SPi2matt	PSBOUND2 ; ! "again"
PS/ssk+:ssk	PSBOUND2 ; ! "back"
PS/ohkan+:ohkan PSBOUND2 ; ! "all"
PS/hkana+:ohkana PSBOUND2 ; ! "all" ! phonology!!
PS/stam+:i2stam PSBOUND2 ; ! "just, unqualifiedly"
PS/itam+:itam PSBOUND2 ; ! "only if"; rel root?
PS/yaahs+:yaahs PSBOUND2 ; ! "pleasing"; variant of aahs- (is this pv or pn?)
PS/otoom+:otoom	PSBOUND2 ; ! "first"; non-initial variant of matoom-
PS/otam+:otam	PSBOUND2 ; ! "important, significant, central"
PS/káák+:i2káák PSBOUND2 ; ! "merely, just, of no great importance"
PS/anow+:anow PSBOUND2 ; ! (believe this is same as ano-)
PS/sstsim+:i2sstsim	PSBOUND2 ; ! "reluctant"; verbal examples
PS/oht+:oht PSBOUND2 ; ! "source, means"; elsewhere; rel root
PS/iiht+:oht PSBOUND2 ; ! "source, means"; elsewhere; rel root
PS/ikipp+:i2kipp PSBOUND2 ; ! "briefly"; initial change
PS/áka+:%^SPa4ka PSBOUND2 ; ! "old, belonging to a former time"; nominal examples
PS/sistsik+:i2sistsik	PSBOUND2 ; ! "tired, exhausted"; verbal examples
PS/yiistap+:yiistap	PSBOUND2 ; ! "away"; non-initial variant of miistap-
PS/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist PSBOUND2 ; ! "slow"
PS/isttani+:i2sttani	PSBOUND2 ; ! "down, below surface or top"; verbal examples
PS/poohsap+:i2poohsap	PSBOUND2 ; ! "toward speaker"
PS/ipiihk+:i2piihk	PSBOUND2 ; ! "in front of, converging along the path of s.o. or s.t. moving"
PS/ikkam+:i2kkam PSBOUND2 ; ! "fast, quickly"; also "if" (maybe different slots?)
PS/isam+:isam	PSBOUND2 ; ! "long"; variant of misam-
PS/iksist+:iksist PSBOUND2 ; ! "finish, at the end"
PS/ohsohkat+:ohsohkat	PSBOUND2 ; ! "the rear periphery of a group"; verbal examples
PS/ohkott+:ohkott PSBOUND2 ; ! "able"
PS/o't+:o't	PSBOUND2 ; ! "near, by speaker's location" ; verbal examples
PS/sa+:sa	PSBOUND2 ; ! "out, away"; verbal examples
PS/maak+:maak PSBOUND2 ; ! "forthcoming, planned"
PS/niit+:niit	PSBOUND2 ; ! "original, genuine"; also "west"
PS/ipiiw+:i2piiw	PSBOUND2 ; ! "far, long distance, remote in space"; w ~ y variation; verbal examples
PS/isttsikohpo+:i2sttsikohpo PSBOUND2 ; ! "grimy"
PS/sikotahko+:sikotahko	PSBOUND2 ; ! "brown"; verbal examples
PS/sstsaap+:i2sstsaap	PSBOUND2 ; ! "bright"
PS/ohsi+:ohsi	PSBOUND2 ; ! "by the wall"; non-initial variant of oohsi-
PS/aanist+:%^SPaanist PSBOUND2 ; ! "manner" (should relative roots have a special slot?)
PS/anist+:%^SPanist PSBOUND2 ; ! "manner" (should relative roots have a special slot?)
PS/omia'nist+:omia'nist	PSBOUND2 ; ! "various, different, miscellaneous"; verbal examples
PS/oomok+:oomok	PSBOUND2 ; ! "crooked, twisted, turn"
PS/ohpo+:ohpo	PSBOUND2 ; ! "greasy, oily"
PS/akoksska+:akoksska PSBOUND2 ; ! "of paramount rank"; nominal examples
PS/piitsiyoohk+:i2piitsiyoohk PSBOUND2 ; ! "when, as soon as"
PS/kaat+:kaat PSBOUND2 ; ! "result"
PS/ama+:ama PSBOUND2 ; ! "pitiful, pathetic"; nominal examples
PS/istsa'+:i2stsa' PSBOUND2 ; ! "last or final time"
PS/ksikk+:ksikk PSBOUND2 ; ! "white"
PS/ohpok+:ohpok	PSBOUND2 ; ! "small"
PS/pok+:pok	PSBOUND2 ; ! "small"
PS/omahk+:omahk PSBOUND2 ; ! "big"
PS/máóhk+:máóhk	PSBOUND2 ; ! "red"
PS/sik+:sik	PSBOUND2 ; ! "black or dark"; verbal examples
PS/mi'k+:mi2'k	PSBOUND2 ; ! "red"; verbal examples; check about final i; i2 because breaks after iik
PS/a'p+:a'p PSBOUND2 ;

LEXICON PSBOUND2
0:%< PSGATE2 ;

LEXICON PSGATE2
PSSET1 ;
PSSET2 ;
VERB_STEMS ;
NOUN_STEMS ;
